Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.400

Unlawful shipment or delivery of horticultural plants into state, when—Certificate and inspection requirements—Christmas trees—Rules—Hearing. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) It is unlawful for any person to ship or deliver any horticultural plant into this state unless it is accompanied by an inspection certificate from the state or country of origin stating that the horticultural plant meets the requirements of this chapter. The director may require the shipper or receiver to file a copy of the manifest of nursery cargo or shipment of horticultural plants into this state with the director on or before the date the horticultural plants enter into the state.

(2) The director may by rule require that any or all horticultural plants or Christmas trees delivered or shipped into the state be inspected for conformance with the requirements of this chapter prior to release by the person delivering or transporting such horticultural plants or Christmas trees even though accompanied by acceptable inspection certificates issued by the state or country of origin.

(3) Any shipment found not to be in compliance with the requirements of this chapter may be returned to the consignor at the consignor's expense. The consignor may subsequently request a hearing which shall be held in conformance with RCW 34.05.479 or other applicable provision of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2007 c 335 s 12; 2000 c 144 s 18; 1993 c 120 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 16.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.400

Unlawful shipment or delivery of plants into state, when—Certificate and inspection requirements—Rules—Hearing. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) It is unlawful for any person to ship or deliver any horticultural plant into this state unless it is accompanied by an inspection certificate from the state or country of origin stating that the horticultural plant meets the requirements of this chapter. The director may require the shipper or receiver to file a copy of the manifest of nursery cargo or shipment of horticultural plants into this state with the director on or before the date the horticultural plants enter into the state.

(2) The director may by rule require that any or all such horticultural plants delivered or shipped into the state be inspected for conformance with the requirements of this chapter prior to release by the person delivering or transporting such horticultural plants even though accompanied by acceptable inspection certificates issued by the state or country of origin.

(3) Any shipment found not to be in compliance with the requirements of this chapter may be returned to the consignor at the consignor's expense. The consignor may subsequently request a hearing which shall be held in conformance with RCW 34.05.479 or other applicable provision of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2000 c 144 s 18; 1993 c 120 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 16.]